Idaho, session 2026, H0511.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 38-111, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
38-111. PROTECTION BY OWNER -- ASSESSMENTS -- BUDGET OF PROTECTIVE
DISTRICTS. (1) Every owner of forest lands in the state shall furnish or
provide therefor, throughout the closed season, protection against the
starting, existence, or spread of fires thereon, or therefrom, in conformity
with reasonable rules and standards for adequate protection, to be estab-
lished by the state board of land commissioners. An owner of forest lands who
maintains a membership in good standing in a forest protective association
operating under agreement with the state board of land commissioners, which
association maintains a standard of protection approved by said board and
who pays the assessments to the association in the amounts required in this
section, shall be deemed to have fully complied herewith. In the event the
owner of any forest land shall neglect or fail to furnish the protection re-
quired in this section, the director of the department of lands shall provide
such patrol and protection therefor at actual cost to the owner of forest
lands. For private owners of forest lands whose total acres of forest lands
are twenty-six (26) acres or more, the state board of land commissioners
shall establish this cost not to exceed sixty-five cents (65¢) an acre per
year. For private owners of forest lands whose total acres of forest lands
are twenty-five (25) acres or fewer, the minimum assessment per year shall be
equal to the per acre cost multiplied by twenty-five (25).
(2) In addition to any other assessment prescribed in this chapter, the
state board of land commissioners shall establish a surcharge to be levied
and assessed in an amount not to exceed forty dollars ($40.00) one hundred
dollars ($100) for each improved lot or parcel to offset costs associated
with wildfire preparedness.
(3) There is hereby established in the state treasury a wildfire equip-
ment replacement fund for the replacement of capital wildfire equipment.
The department of lands shall determine reimbursement rates for all capital
fire equipment used for activities other than fire preparedness. Reimburse-
ment revenues shall be deposited in the wildfire equipment replacement fund.
Additional moneys may be deposited into the wildfire equipment replacement
fund from any other source.
(4) In the event an assessment is made in an amount less than the maxi-
mum hereinbefore provided, and an actual loss occurs which that exceeds the


amount budgeted and for which assessments have been made, the director of
the department of lands, with the approval of the board, may require an addi-
tional assessment to be made and paid, which together with the original as-
sessment shall not exceed the maximum assessment set forth in this section.
Such additional assessment shall be levied and collected in the same manner
as herein provided for the collection of such original assessments. The li-
ability provided in this section shall be calculated for each forest protec-
tion district or association separately, and shall be calculated solely upon
on the charges assignable to fire control or presuppression of fires within
each district or association.
(5) Each forest protective association actively engaged in forest pro-
tection under agreement with the state board of land commissioners shall
each year prepare in detail, a budget of all estimated operating costs for
the next fiscal year and shall submit this budget to the board for approval
before August 31 of the current year.
(6) Except for the provisions of section 38-122, Idaho Code, and cases
of proven negligence by the landowner or his agent, no other charges or as-
sessments for fire protection shall be made or assessed or collected from
those forest landowners participating as provided herein.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.